Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 1. Day Care Assistance and Child Care Grants.

Administrative Code. —

For child care assistance program, see 7 AAC 41.

For child care grant program, see 7 AAC 39.

Sec. 47.25.001.
Powers and duties.

The department shall

implement and administer a program to assist in providing day care for the children of low and moderate income families according to the requirements of AS

47.25.001

—

47.25.095

;

establish standards of eligibility for day care benefits;

contract for the care of children of eligible families;

establish procedures to periodically review the needs of families receiving day care benefits;

provide notification to the local government body of the request for a contract with a day care facility.

The department may

adopt regulations necessary for the performance of its duties under AS

47.25.001

—

47.25.095

;

contract with other entities to perform duties of the department under AS

47.25.001

—

47.25.095

within an area specified by the department; within an area, the department shall give higher priority to contracting with municipalities than with other organizations.

History.

(E.O. No. 108 § 16 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2003, in this section “AS

47.25.001

—

47.25.095

” was substituted for “AS

47.25.001

— 47.25.009” to reflect the 2003 renumbering of AS 47.25.002 — 47.25.009.

Administrative Code. —

For program provisions, see 7 AAC 39, art. 1.

For administrative review, see 7 AAC 39, art. 2.

For administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 41, art. 1.

For provisions for providers, see 7 AAC 41, art. 2.

For provisions for families, see 7 AAC 41, art. 3.

For definitions, see 7 AAC 41, art. 5.

For hearings, see 7 AAC 49.

Sec. 47.25.010.
[Renumbered as AS 47.55.010.]

Sec. 47.25.011.
Administrative costs of program contractors.

To defray administrative expenses, a contractor under AS

47.25.001(b)

may only retain $1,000 or 12 percent, whichever is greater, of the day care assistance program funds it receives from the department under the contract.

History.

(E.O. No. 108 § 16 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.25.002. Renumbered in 2003.

Sec. 47.25.020.
[Renumbered as AS 47.55.020.]

Sec. 47.25.021.
Conditions of receipt of benefits.

Benefits may be paid for the care of children of a low or moderate income family only if a parent or guardian, because of the day care, is freed to work or to seek work or to attend school. Benefits may not be paid for the care of children of a family where one parent or guardian is not working, actively seeking work, or attending school and is physically and mentally capable of caring for the children.

History.

(E.O. No. 108 § 16 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.25.003. Renumbered in 2003.

Administrative Code. —

For administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 41, art. 1.

For provisions for families, see 7 AAC 41, art. 3.

Sec. 47.25.030.
[Renumbered as AS 47.55.030.]

Sec. 47.25.031.
Eligibility of families for benefits.

The department shall determine the eligibility of families for day care benefits on the basis of the following factors:

income of the family including salary, alimony, child support, retirement benefits, social security, and any other source of income;

number of children in the family;

whether there is one parent or guardian solely responsible for the care of the family.

History.

(E.O. No. 108 § 16 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.25.004. Renumbered in 2003.

Administrative Code. —

For administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 41, art. 1.

For provisions for families, see 7 AAC 41, art. 3.

Sec. 47.25.035.
[Renumbered as AS 47.55.035.]

Sec. 47.25.040.
[Renumbered as AS 47.55.040.]

Sec. 47.25.041.
Contributions by parent or guardian.

The department shall develop a sliding fee scale based on the factors listed in AS

47.25.031

for purposes of determining the amount to be contributed by the parent or guardian for child care. The contribution of the parent or guardian shall be paid to the day care facility.

History.

(E.O. No. 108 § 16 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.25.005. Renumbered in 2003, at which time “AS

47.25.031

” was substituted for “AS 47.25.004” to reflect the 2003 renumbering of AS 47.25.004.

Administrative Code. —

For administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 41, art. 1.

For provisions for families, see 7 AAC 41, art. 3.

Sec. 47.25.050.
[Renumbered as AS 47.55.050.]

Sec. 47.25.051.
Placement; payment by state.

Parents or guardians shall select the day care facility for the care of their children.

Benefits shall be paid by the department directly to the municipality or organization contracting with the day care facility.

History.

(E.O. No. 108 § 16 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.25.006. Renumbered in 2003.

Administrative Code. —

For provisions for providers, see 7 AAC 41, art. 2.

For provisions for families, see 7 AAC 41, art. 3.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Provision under federal law and state administration under which a parent who qualifies for a day care subsidy may direct that the state subsidy payment be made directly to a child care facility operated by religious organizations is presumed constitutional and not violative of the “Establishment” clauses of the United States and Alaska Constitutions, until found otherwise by a court. June 4, 1999, Op. Att’y Gen. (This opinion was provided under former AS 44.47.300.)

Sec. 47.25.060.
[Renumbered as AS 47.55.060.]

Sec. 47.25.070.
[Renumbered as AS 47.55.070.]

Sec. 47.25.071.
Child care grant program.

A child care grant program is established in the department to provide state assistance in the operation of child care facilities. The department shall provide grants for the operation of child care facilities, including private nonprofit child care facilities. Participation in the program is optional.

To qualify for a grant under (a) or (d) of this section, the child care facility must

be currently licensed under AS 47.32 and applicable municipal licensing requirements;

participate in the day care assistance program under AS

47.25.001

—

47.25.095

; and

provide care under a payment system as provided in (g) of this section.

A grant under (a) of this section may not exceed $50 per month for each child the child care facility cares for, or for each full-time equivalent, as determined by the department. The grant shall be adjusted on a geographic basis by the same factor as funding for a school district is adjusted in AS

14.17.460

.

In addition to the grants provided in (a) of this section, the department may, subject to appropriations for that purpose, provide by grant or contract for the education and training of child care employees or administrators. To receive a grant or contract under this subsection or to participate in a training program under this subsection, the child care facility must meet all the requirements of (b) of this section.

An application for a grant under this section shall be made in the form established by the department.

A grant under (a) of this section shall be made monthly or quarterly and shall be based on the monthly average daily full-time equivalent enrollment in the child care facility. If the method of payment for the grant is other than monthly, it shall be at the request of the child care facility with the approval of the department. Based on criteria established by the department, the department may make quarterly advance payments.

Each child care facility receiving a grant under (a) or (d) of this section shall assure that at least 15 percent or one of its child care spaces receiving subsidy under this section, whichever is greater, will be made available, if requested, to children eligible for day care assistance under AS

47.25.001

—

47.25.095

, whose parents or guardians wish to pay for care based on attendance only.

The department shall, in consultation with interested child care providers and parents, adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this section.

History.

(E.O. No. 108 § 16 (2003); am § 28 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.25.007. Renumbered in 2003, at which time “AS

47.25.001

—

47.25.095

” was substituted for “AS

47.25.001

— 47.25.009” to reflect the 2003 renumbering of AS 47.25.002 — 47.25.009.

Administrative Code. —

For program provisions, see 7 AAC 39, art. 1.

For administrative review, see 7 AAC 39, art. 2.

For hearings, see 7 AAC 49.

For grant programs, see 7 AAC 78.

For grant services for individuals, see 7 AAC 81.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 2, 2005, updated a section reference in paragraph (b)(1).

Sec. 47.25.080.
[Renumbered as AS 47.55.080.]

Sec. 47.25.090.
[Renumbered as AS 47.55.090.]

Sec. 47.25.095.
Definitions for day care assistance and child care grant programs.

In AS

47.25.001

—

47.25.095

,

“child” means a person below 13 years of age, or a minor who has a developmental disability;

“child care facility” means an establishment licensed as a child care facility under AS 47.32, including day care centers, family day care homes, and schools for preschool age children, that provides care for children not related by blood, marriage, or legal adoption to the owner, operator, or manager of the facility;

“day care” means the care, supervision, and guidance of a child or children unaccompanied by a parent or legal guardian on a regular basis for periods of less than 24 hours a day;

“day care facility” means a center or home licensed in accordance with the provisions of AS 47.32 as a child care facility or recognized by the federal government for the care of children;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“developmental disability” means a disability under which a person is incapable of self-care, as verified by a physician or licensed or certified psychologist who has examined the person.

History.

(E.O. No. 108 § 16 (2003); am §§ 29, 30 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.25.009. Renumbered in 2003, at which time “AS

47.25.001

—

47.25.095

” was substituted for “AS

47.25.001

— 47.25.009” to reflect the 2003 renumbering of AS 47.25.002 — 47.25.009.

Administrative Code. —

For provisions for families, see 7 AAC 41, art. 3.

For definitions, see 7 AAC 41, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 2, 2005, inserted “as a child care facility” and updated a section reference in paragraphs (2) and (4).

Sec. 47.25.100.
[Renumbered as AS 47.55.100.]

Sec. 47.25.110.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 118 SLA 1968.]